Utah statutes.
4-18-106.   Agriculture Resource Development Fund -- Contents -- Use of fund money.

(1)  There is created a revolving loan fund known as the Agriculture Resource Development Fund.

(2)  The Agriculture Resource Development Fund shall consist of:

(a)  money appropriated to it by the Legislature;

(b)  sales and use tax receipts transferred to the fund in accordance with Section 59-12-103;

(c)  money received for the repayment of loans made from the fund;

(d)  money made available to the state for agriculture resource development from any source; and

(e)  interest earned on the fund.

(3)  The commission shall make loans from the Agriculture Resource Development Fund as provided by Section 4-18-105.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 227, 2013 General Session

